Hawaii statutes.
[§704-420] Examination reports;
provided to director of health. Copies of all examination reports made
pursuant to sections 704-404, 704-406, 704-411, and 704-414 shall be provided
to the director of health. [L 2016, c 231, pt of §3]

COMMENTARY ON §704-420

Act 231, Session Laws 2016, added this section to
implement recommendations made by the Penal Code Review Committee convened
pursuant to House Concurrent Resolution No. 155, S.D. 1 (2015).

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next